Missouri, session 2026, HB3027.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 144.054, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 144.054 and 620.1641, to read as follows:
144.054. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Critical materials", metal or metal complexes that serve an essential
function in key energy, defense, and consumer product technologies and have a high risk
of supply chain disruption;
(2) "Critical pharmaceuticals", pharmaceutical active ingredients, key starting
materials, or essential finished pharmaceuticals identified as critical to national security
or public health and having a high risk of supply chain disruption;
(3) "Nuclear security enterprise", the same meaning as defined in 50 U.S.C. Section
2501, inclusive of buildings, structures, and infrastructure constructed for use as a defense
nuclear facility as defined in 50 U.S.C. Section 2501;
[(2)] (4) "Processing", any mode of treatment, act, or series of acts performed upon
materials to transform or reduce them to a different state or thing, including treatment
necessary to maintain or preserve such processing by the producer at the production facility;
[(3)] (5) "Producing" includes, but is not limited to, the production of, including the
production and transmission of, telecommunication services;
[(4)] (6) "Product" includes, but is not limited to, telecommunications services,
critical materials, and critical pharmaceuticals;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3027 2
[(5)] (7) "Recovered materials", those materials which have been diverted or removed
from the solid waste stream for sale, use, reuse, or recycling, whether or not they require
subsequent separation and processing.
2. In addition to all other exemptions granted under this chapter, there is hereby
specifically exempted from the provisions of this chapter and the local sales tax law as
defined in section 32.085 and from the computation of the tax levied, assessed, or payable
under this chapter and the local sales tax law as defined in section 32.085, electrical energy
and gas, whether natural, artificial, or propane, water, coal, and energy sources, chemicals,
machinery, equipment, and materials used or consumed in the manufacturing, processing,
compounding, mining, or producing of any product, or used or consumed in the processing of
recovered materials, or used in research and development related to manufacturing,
processing, compounding, mining, or producing any product. The construction and
application of this subsection as expressed by the Missouri supreme court in DST Systems,
Inc. v. Director of Revenue, 43 S.W.3d 799 (Mo. banc 2001); Southwestern Bell Tel. Co. v.
Director of Revenue, 78 S.W.3d 763 (Mo. banc 2002); and Southwestern Bell Tel. Co. v.
Director of Revenue, 182 S.W.3d 226 (Mo. banc 2005), is hereby affirmed.
3. In addition to all other exemptions granted under this chapter, there is hereby
specifically exempted from the provisions of this chapter and the local sales tax law as
defined in section 32.085, and from the computation of the tax levied, assessed, or payable
under this chapter and the local sales tax law as defined in section 32.085, all utilities,
machinery, and equipment used or consumed directly in television or radio broadcasting and
all sales and purchases of tangible personal property, utilities, services, or any other
transaction that would otherwise be subject to the state or local sales or use tax when such
sales are made to or purchases are made by a contractor for use in fulfillment of any
obligation under a defense contract with the United States government, and all sales and
leases of tangible personal property by any county, city, incorporated town, or village,
provided such sale or lease is authorized under chapter 100, and such transaction is certified
for sales tax exemption by the department of economic development, and tangible personal
property used for railroad infrastructure brought into this state for processing, fabrication, or
other modification for use outside the state in the regular course of business.
4. In addition to all other exemptions granted under this chapter, there is hereby
specifically exempted from the provisions of this chapter and the local sales tax law as
defined in section 32.085, and from the computation of the tax levied, assessed, or payable
under this chapter and the local sales tax law as defined in section 32.085, all sales and
purchases of tangible personal property, utilities, services, or any other transaction that would
otherwise be subject to the state or local sales or use tax when such sales are made to or

HB 3027 3
purchases are made by a private partner for use in completing a project under sections
227.600 to 227.669.
5. In addition to all other exemptions granted under this chapter, there is hereby
specifically exempted from the provisions of this chapter and the local sales tax law as
defined in section 32.085, and from the computation of the tax levied, assessed, or payable
under this chapter and the local sales tax law as defined in section 32.085, all materials,
manufactured goods, machinery and parts, electrical energy and gas, whether natural,
artificial or propane, water, coal and other energy sources, chemicals, soaps, detergents,
cleaning and sanitizing agents, and other ingredients and materials inserted by commercial or
industrial laundries to treat, clean, and sanitize textiles in facilities which process at least five
hundred pounds of textiles per hour and at least sixty thousand pounds per week.
6. In addition to all other exemptions granted pursuant to this chapter, there is hereby
exempted from the provisions of and the computation of the tax levied, assessed, or payable
pursuant to this chapter and the local sales tax law as defined in section 32.085, all sales and
purchases of tangible personal property, building materials, equipment, fixtures,
manufactured goods, machinery, and parts for the purposes of constructing all or any
portion of a nuclear security enterprise located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county. This subsection shall expire on
August 28, 2034.
620.1641. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Defense and Energy Independence Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Critical materials", metal or metal complexes that serve an essential
function in key energy, defense, and consumer product technologies and have a high risk
of supply chain disruption;
(2) "Critical pharmaceuticals", pharmaceutical active ingredients, key starting
materials, or essential finished pharmaceuticals identified as critical to national security
or public health and having a high risk of supply chain disruption;
(3) "Department", the Missouri department of economic development;
(4) "Missouri development finance board" or "MDFB", the Missouri
development finance board established under section 100.265;
(5) "Notice of intent", a form developed by the department and available online,
completed by the qualified company, and submitted to the department stating the
qualified company's intent to request tax credits under this section as provided in
subsection 5 of this section;
(6) "Project facility", the building or buildings used by a qualified company at
which critical materials or critical pharmaceuticals will be produced or processed;

HB 3027 4
(7) "Qualified company", a firm, partnership, joint venture, association, private
or public corporation regardless of whether organized for profit, or headquarters of
such entity registered to do business in Missouri, that is a nontraditional defense
contractor, as such term is defined in 10 U.S.C. Section 3014, as amended, and that
incurs qualified project costs;
(8) "Qualified project costs", costs incurred by a qualified company for the
construction, expansion, or conversion of facilities and acquisition of equipment for the
production of critical materials or critical pharmaceuticals including, but not limited to:
(a) Site preparation;
(b) Building construction or renovation;
(c) Machinery and equipment acquisition and installation, including any
specialized manufacturing equipment;
(d) Utility infrastructure; and
(e) Environmental compliance systems;
(9) "State tax liability", any liability incurred by a taxpayer pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 143 or chapter 148, exclusive of the provisions relating to the
withholding of tax as provided for in sections 143.191 to 143.265 and related provisions;
(10) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter 143 or
chapter 148, excluding withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265.
3. (1) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, the department
may award a qualified company tax credits for qualified project costs incurred by the
qualified company on or after January 1, 2027, provided that no tax credit shall be
authorized for any qualified company that incurs less than five million dollars in
qualified project costs. The amount of the tax credit shall be equal to:
(a) For qualified companies that incur qualified project costs of at least five
million dollars but less than fifteen million dollars, twenty percent of such qualified
project costs; and
(b) For qualified companies that incur qualified project costs of at least fifteen
million dollars, twenty-five percent of qualified project costs.
(2) Tax credits authorized by this section shall not be refundable, but may be
carried forward for ten subsequent tax years or until the full amount of the tax credit
has been redeemed, whichever occurs first.
(3) Tax credits authorized by this section may be transferred, sold, or otherwise
assigned by filing a notarized endorsement thereof with the department that names the
transferee, the amount of tax credit transferred, and the value received for the credit, as
well as any other information reasonably requested by the department. For a qualified
company with flow-through tax treatment to its members, partners, or shareholders, the

HB 3027 5
tax credit shall be allowed to members, partners, or shareholders in proportion to their
share of ownership on the last day of the qualified company's tax period.
4. The cumulative amount of tax credits that may be authorized pursuant to this
section shall not exceed forty million dollars in any fiscal year. If the amount of tax
credits applied for in a fiscal year exceeds forty million dollars, tax credits shall be
allowed based on the order in which they are claimed.
5. A qualified company seeking tax credits authorized by this section shall
submit a notice of intent to the department. Upon approval of a notice of intent to
receive tax credits under this section, the department and the qualified company shall
enter into a written agreement, which shall specify, at a minimum:
(1) The types and amounts of critical materials that will be produced or
processed at the project facility, along with any supporting information from the federal
Department of the Interior, Department of Energy, or Department of Defense indicating
a shortage or threat to supply of such critical materials;
(2) The types and amounts of critical pharmaceuticals that will be produced or
processed at the project facility, along with any supporting information from the federal
Food and Drug Administration, Department of Defense, Department of Veterans
Affairs, or Department of Health and Human Services indicating a shortage or threat to
supply of such critical pharmaceuticals;
(3) The estimated amount of capital investment to be made and the estimated
number of new jobs to be created at the project facility;
(4) Clawback provisions, as may be required by the department;
(5) Financial guarantee provisions as may be required by the department; and
(6) Any other provisions the department may require.
6. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Grants for
Independence from Foreign Influence Fund", which shall consist of at least ten
million dollars appropriated by the general assembly and any gifts, contributions,
grants, or bequests received from federal, private, or other sources. The state treasurer
shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
appropriation, moneys in the fund shall be used solely as provided in subsection 7 of this
section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.

HB 3027 6
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
7. (1) The department shall develop and implement grants for independence
from foreign influence as provided in this subsection.
(2) The department shall establish procedures for the solicitation, evaluation,
and approval of grant applications received from a qualified company. A qualified
company may submit a grant application for the award of moneys for qualified project
costs incurred by the qualified company as provided in this subsection.
100 (3) The department shall evaluate each application and approve or reject such
101 application. Subject to appropriations, upon approval of an application, the MDFB
102 shall serve as the third-party administrator of the grant funds, and shall disburse the
103 grant award from the grants for independence from foreign influence fund in an
104 amount not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars per grant application.
105 (4) Moneys granted to a qualified company under this section shall be used solely
106 for qualified project costs incurred before the completion of the project facility.
107 8. The department shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
108 administration of this section including, but not limited to, rules relating to the
109 verification of a qualified company's qualified project costs. Any rule or portion of a
110 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
111 delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
112 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
113 chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
114 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
115 a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
116 and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
117 9. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
118 (1) The program authorized pursuant to this section shall automatically sunset
119 on December 31, 2036, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
120 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
121 immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized pursuant to
122 this section is sunset; and
123 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to impair or impede
124 the state's fulfillment of any obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or

HB 3027 7
125 redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section prior to the date the
126 program authorized pursuant to this section is sunset.
✔